Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-14] Use of
voter's electronic-mail address. (a) The local election official
shall request an electronic-mail address from each covered voter who registers
to vote after [July 1, 2012]. An electronic-mail address provided by a covered
voter may not be made available to the public or any individual or organization
other than an authorized agent of the local election official and is exempt
from disclosure under chapter 92F. The electronic-mail address may be used
only for official communication with the voter about the voting process,
including transmitting military-overseas ballots and election materials if the
voter has requested electronic transmission, and verifying the voter's mailing
address and physical location.

(b) A covered voter
who provides an electronic-mail address may request that the voter's
application for a military-overseas ballot be considered a standing request for
electronic delivery of a ballot for all elections held through December 31 of
the calendar year of the date of the application or another shorter period the
voter specifies, including for any runoff elections that occur as a result of
those elections. An election official shall provide a military-overseas ballot
to a voter who makes a standing request for each election to which the request
is applicable. A covered voter who is entitled to receive a military-overseas
ballot for a primary election under this subsection is entitled to receive a
military-overseas ballot for the general election. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next